Maine, session 132, LD822.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §3314, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 136, §5, is further
amended to read:
2. Suspended disposition. The court may impose any of the dispositional alternatives
provided in subsection 1 and may suspend its disposition and place the juvenile on a
specified period of probation that is subject to such provisions of Title 17‑A, section 1807
as the court may order and that is administered pursuant to the provisions of Title 34‑A,
chapter 5, subchapter 4, except that the court may not impose the condition set out in Title
17‑A, section 1807, subsection 6. The court may impose as a condition of probation that a
juvenile must reside outside the juvenile's home in a setting satisfactory to the juvenile
community corrections officer if the court determines that reasonable efforts have been
made to prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the juvenile from the juvenile's home
or that no reasonable efforts are necessary because of the existence of an aggravating factor
as defined in Title 22, section 4002, subsection 1‑B, and that continuation in the juvenile's
home would be contrary to the welfare of the juvenile. Imposition of such a condition does
not affect the legal custody of the juvenile.
Modification of probation is governed by the procedures contained in Title 17‑A, section
1804, subsections 7 and 8. Termination of probation is governed by the procedures
contained in Title 17‑A, section 1804, subsection 10. Revocation of probation is governed
by the procedures contained in Title 17‑A, sections 1809 to 1812, except that this
subsection governs the court's determinations concerning probable cause and continued
detention and those provisions of Title 17‑A, section 1812, subsection 6 allowing a vacating
of part of the suspension of execution apply only to a suspended fine under subsection 1,
paragraph G or a suspended period of confinement under paragraph H. A suspended
commitment under subsection 1, paragraph F may be modified to a disposition under
subsection 1, paragraph H. When a revocation of probation results in the imposition of a
disposition under subsection 1, paragraph F or a period of confinement under subsection 1,
paragraph H, the court shall determine whether reasonable efforts have been made to
prevent or eliminate the need for removal of the juvenile from the juvenile's home or that
no reasonable efforts are necessary because of the existence of an aggravating factor as
defined in Title 22, section 4002, subsection 1‑B and whether continuation in the juvenile's
home would be contrary to the welfare of the juvenile. This determination does not affect
whether the court orders a particular disposition upon a revocation of probation. If the
juvenile is being detained for an alleged violation of probation, the court shall review within
48 hours following the detention, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays, the
decision to detain the juvenile. Following that review, the court shall order the juvenile's
release unless the court finds that there is probable cause to believe that the juvenile has
violated a condition of probation and finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that
continued detention is necessary to meet one of the purposes of detention under section
3203‑A, subsection 4, paragraph C. When a court orders continued detention, the court
shall determine whether reasonable efforts have been made to prevent or eliminate the need
for removal of the juvenile from the juvenile's home or that no reasonable efforts are
necessary because of the existence of an aggravating factor as defined in Title 22, section
4002, subsection 1‑B and whether continuation in the juvenile's home would be contrary
to the welfare of the juvenile. This determination does not affect whether the court orders
continued detention.
Page 1 - 132LR0835(01)

Sec. 2. 17-A MRSA §1752, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 17-A MRSA §1754, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 17-A MRSA §1807, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is
repealed.
Sec. 5. 17-A MRSA §1807, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. A, §2, is
repealed.